Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.080

Practice limited to federally qualified health centers and look-alikes.

(1) A dental therapist may practice only in federally qualified health centers, tribal federally qualified health centers, and federally qualified health center look-alikes.

(2) A dentist providing dental services at a federally qualified health center is not required to enter a practice plan contract and may not face retaliation or default on a loan repayment contract if the dentist refuses to enter into a practice plan contract or supervise a dental therapist.

(3) For purposes of this section, a "tribal federally qualified health center" means a tribal facility operating in accordance with Title XIX Sec. 1905(l)(2)(B) of the social security act and the Indian self-determination and education assistance act (P.L. 93-638) and that enrolls in Washington medicaid as a tribal federally qualified health center.

[ 2023 c 460 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.